District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.77

Prohibition on Capital Funds for Operating Expenses.

The Mayor shall not expend any moneys borrowed for capital projects for operating expenses of the District of Columbia government.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-226, § 4(d), 48 DCR 1603

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4(d) of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-524, January 11, 2001, 48 DCR 624).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-563, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1625).